California, session 20252026, AB1916.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 71801 of the Government Code is amended to read:71801. For purposes of this chapter, the following definitions shall apply:(a) “Certified interpreter” and “registered interpreter” have the same meanings as in Article 4 (commencing with Section 68560) of Chapter 2. This chapter applies to sign language interpreters.(b) “Court proceedings” has the same meaning as subdivision (a) of Section 68560.5.(c) “Cross-assign” and “cross-assignment” refer to the appointment of a court interpreter employed by a trial court to perform spoken language interpretation services in another trial court, pursuant to Section 71810.(d) “Employee organization” means a labor organization that has as one of its purposes representing employees in their relations with the trial courts.(e) “Intermittent, part-time interpreter” is a court interpreter who works as an intermittent employee on a day-by-day basis as described in Section 71803.(f) “Local compensation” means any amounts paid to employee interpreters by an individual trial court that are not paid pursuant to the regional memorandum of understanding and are not calculated on an hourly basis.(g) “Mediation” means effort by an impartial third party to assist in reconciling a dispute regarding wages, hours, and other terms and conditions of employment between representatives of the trial court or regional court interpreter committee and the recognized employee organization through interpretation, suggestion, and advice.(h) “Meet and confer in good faith” means that a trial court or regional court interpreter committee or those representatives it may designate, and representatives of a recognized employee organization, shall have the mutual obligation personally to meet and confer promptly upon request by either party and continue for a reasonable period of time in order to exchange freely information, opinions, and proposals, and to endeavor to reach agreement on matters within the scope of representation. The process shall include adequate time for the resolution of impasses where specific procedures for resolution are contained in this chapter, or when the procedures are used by mutual consent.(i) “Personnel rules,” “personnel policies, procedures, and plans,” and “rules and regulations” mean policies, procedures, plans, rules, or regulations adopted by a trial court or its designee pertaining to conditions of employment of trial court employees, subject to meet and confer in good faith.(j) “Recognized employee organization” means an employee organization that has been formally acknowledged to represent the court interpreters employed by the trial courts in a region, pursuant to this chapter.(k) “Regional court interpreter employment relations committee” means the committee established pursuant to Section 71807.(l) “Regional transition period” means the period from January 1, 2003, to July 1, 2005, inclusive, except that the transition period for the region may be terminated earlier by a memorandum of understanding or agreement between the regional court interpreter employment relations committee and a recognized employee organization.(m) “Relay interpreting” is the process by which two interpreters with different language pairs work in tandem to communicate between the target language and English.(n) “Spoken language” includes American Sign Language. (n)(o) “Transfer” means transfer within the trial court as defined in the trial court’s personnel policies, procedures, and plans, subject to meet and confer in good faith.(o)(p) “Trial court” means the superior court in each county.(p)(q) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2025.